Colorado statutes. TITLE 9 Safety - Industrial and Commercial
ARTICLE 6
EXPLOSIVES

Section

9-6-101. Explosives on passenger vehicles and trains.

It is unlawful to transport, carry, convey, or deliver to be transported, carried, or conveyed, or to cause to be delivered to be transported, carried, or conveyed any of the substances or articles known as dynamite, nitroglycerine, or glycerine oil, nitroleum or blasting oil, or nitrated oil, or powder mixed with any such oil, or fiber saturated with any such article or substance in any vehicle used or employed in transporting passengers, or in any train of cars used in transporting passengers; except that an ordinary freight train with a caboose or passenger car used as a caboose shall not be construed as a train of cars used in transporting passengers within the meaning of sections 9-6-101 to 9-6-104.

Source:

L. 1876:

p. 96, § 1.

G.L.

§ 1852.

G.S.

§ 2788.

R.S. 08:

§ 5286.

C.L.

§ 5505.

CSA:

C. 64, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 53-1-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 53-1-1.

9-6-102. Packing for shipment.

It is unlawful to ship, send, or forward nitroglycerine, glycerine oil, nitrated oil, nitroleum or blasting oil, or to transport any of the same upon any vehicle of any description, or to deliver the same to be transported, carried, or conveyed unless the same is securely enclosed, deposited, or packed in a metallic vessel surrounded by plaster of paris or other material that is nonexplosive when saturated with such oil or substance, and separate from all other substances, and the outside of the package containing the same is marked or labeled in a conspicuous manner with the words "nitroglycerine - dangerous".

Source:

L. 1876:

p. 97, § 2.

G.L.

§ 1853.

L. 1881:

p. 194, § 1.

G.S.

§ 2789.

R.S. 08:

§ 5287.

C.L.

§ 5506.

CSA:

C. 64, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 53-1-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 53-1-2.

9-6-103. Violation - penalty.

Any person who knowingly violates any of the provisions of sections 9-6-101 and 9-6-102 commits a class 6 felony and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 1876:

p. 97, § 3.

G.L.

§ 1854.

G.S.

§ 2790.

R.S. 08:

§ 5288.

C.L.

§ 5507.

CSA:

C. 64, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 53-1-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 53-1-3.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 870, § 21, effective July 1, 1979.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 821, § 8, effective June 8.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1467, § 23, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

The effective date for amendments made to this section by chapter 216, L. 77, was changed from July 1, 1978, to April 1, 1979, by chapter 1, First Extraordinary Session, L. 78, and was subsequently changed to July 1, 1979, by chapter 157, § 23, L. 79. See People v. McKenna, 199 Colo. 452, 611 P.2d 574 (1980).

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

9-6-104. Death by negligence.

When the death of any person is caused by the explosion of any of the articles or substances named in section 9-6-101 while the same is being delivered to any carrier or while the same is being transported or is being removed from the vehicle on which it has been transported or conveyed or on which it has been placed for transportation, every person who knowingly and unlawfully placed, or aided, or permitted the placing of such article or substance on such vehicle, or delivered the same, or caused the same to be delivered contrary to the provisions of sections 9-6-101 to 9-6-104, commits a class 4 felony and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 1876:

p. 97, § 4.

G.L.

§ 1855.

G.S.

§ 2791.

R.S. 08:

§ 5289.

C.L.

§ 5508.

CSA:

C. 64, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 53-1-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 53-1-4.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 870, § 22, effective July 1, 1979.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1467, § 24, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

The effective date for amendments made to this section by chapter 216, L. 77, was changed from July 1, 1978, to April 1, 1979, by chapter 1, First Extraordinary Session, L. 78, and was subsequently changed to July 1, 1979, by chapter 157, § 23, L. 79. See People v. McKenna, 199 Colo. 452, 611 P.2d 574 (1980).

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

9-6-105. Marking for sale.

It is unlawful for any person, partnership, or corporation to sell or offer for sale, or take or solicit orders of sale for, or purchase or use, or have on hand or in store for the purpose of sale or use in this state any high explosive that can be detonated by means of a detonator, including without limitation dynamite, detonating cord, cast primers, and cap-sensitive emulsions, slurries, and water gels, or any cartridge or bag containing a blasting agent, or any container used for the packaging of detonators and blasting caps, unless on each container or bag of any such high explosive, blasting agent, detonator, or blasting cap and on each wrapping of the explosive cartridge contained within, there is plainly stamped or printed the name and place of business of the person, partnership, or corporation by which the same was manufactured and a date code or other code identifying the origin of manufacture.

It is unlawful to intentionally remove, alter, or obscure the printed or stamped manufacturer's name and date codes or other identifying codes on the containers used to contain any high explosives, blasting agents, detonators, or blasting caps or on any wrappings thereof.

Mixed binary explosives shall not be subject to the provisions of this section.

Source:

L. 1887:

p. 278, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 5290.

C.L.

§ 5509.

CSA:

C. 64, § 5.

CRS 53:

§ 53-1-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 53-1-5.

L. 2001:

Entire section amended, p. 759, § 1, effective August 8.

9-6-106. Date of manufacture - wrapping.

It is unlawful for any person, partnership, or corporation to have more than two different dates or identifying codes on any high explosive that can be detonated by means of a detonator, including without limitation dynamite, detonating cord, cast primer, cap-sensitive emulsion, slurries, and water gels, or on any cartridges or bags containing blasting agents, or on any container used for the packaging of detonators or blasting caps.

It is also unlawful for any person, partnership, or corporation to package any explosives in any container or wrapping formerly used by any other person, partnership, or corporation in the packing of high explosives, detonators, blasting caps, or cartridges or bags containing blasting agents.

The name and place of business of the manufacturer and the date codes or other codes identifying the origin of manufacture shall be the same on the packing container as on each of the high explosive cartridges or blasting agent cartridges within such packing container.

Source:

L. 1887:

p. 278, § 2.

R.S. 08:

§ 5291.

C.L.

§ 5510.

CSA:

C. 64, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 53-1-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 53-1-6.

L. 2001:

Entire section amended, p. 760, § 2, effective August 8.

9-6-107. Violation - penalty.

If any person, partnership, or corporation violates any of the provisions of sections 9-6-105 and 9-6-106, such person, the members of such partnership, or the officers or agents of such corporation commit a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 1887:

p. 279, § 3.

R.S. 08:

§ 5292.

C.L.

§ 5511.

CSA:

C. 64, § 7.

CRS 53:

§ 53-1-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 53-1-7.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3145, § 105, effective March 1, 2022.

9-6-108. Applicability.

Consumer fireworks and display fireworks, as defined in 27 CFR 555.11 of the United States department of justice, bureau of alcohol, tobacco, firearms, and explosives, or any of its successor agencies, shall not be subject to the provisions of this article.

Source:

L. 2001:

Entire section added, p. 760, § 3, effective August 8.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 2019, § 8, effective June 1.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (SB 19-241), ch. 390, p. 3463, § 4, effective August 2.